Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 11 Prevention of Public Offenses
12-12-904. Failure to comply with registration and reporting requirements — Refusal to cooperate with assessment process.

It is an affirmative defense to prosecution if the person:

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 11; 1999, No. 1353, § 2; 2001, No. 1743, § 3; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 1; 2007, No. 394, § 3; 2013, No. 172, § 2; 2015, No. 358, § 1; 2017, No. 916, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 702.

12-12-905. Applicability.

Is adjudicated guilty on or after August 1, 1997, of a sex offense, aggravated sex offense, or sexually violent offense;

Is serving a sentence of incarceration, probation, parole, or other form of community supervision as a result of an adjudication of guilt on or after August 1, 1997, for a sex offense, aggravated sex offense, or sexually violent offense;

Is acquitted on or after August 1, 1997, on the grounds of mental disease or defect for a sex offense, aggravated sex offense, or sexually violent offense;

A person who has been adjudicated guilty of a sex offense and whose record of conviction will be expunged under the provisions of §§16-93-301 —16-93-303 is not relieved of the duty to register or verify registration.

(1)If the underlying conviction of the registrant is reversed, vacated, or set aside or if the registrant is pardoned, the registrant is relieved from the duty to register or verify registration.

Registration or registration verification shall cease upon the receipt and verification by the Arkansas Crime Information Center of documentation from the:

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 4; 1999, No. 1353, § 3; 2001, No. 1743, § 4; 2003, No. 1265, § 2; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 2; 2007, No. 394, § 4.

12-12-906. Duty to register or verify registration generally — Review of requirements with offenders.

(A)A sex offender who moves to or returns to this state from another jurisdiction and who would be required to register as a sex offender in the jurisdiction in which he or she was adjudicated guilty or delinquent of a sex offense shall register with the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction in person within five (5) calendar days after the sex offender moves to a municipality or county of this state.

Immediately prior to the release or discharge of a sex offender or immediately following a sex offender's escape or his or her absconding from supervision, the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, the Arkansas State Hospital, or the Department of Human Services shall update the registration file of the sex offender who is to be released or discharged or who has escaped or has absconded from supervision.

When updating the registration file of a sex offender, the Division of Correction, the Division of Community Correction, the Arkansas State Hospital, or the Department of Human Services shall:

(A)The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction may determine the appropriate times and days for in-person reporting by the sex offender, and the determination shall be consistent with the reporting requirements of subdivision (g)(1) of this section.

Registration verification shall include reporting in person any change to the following information concerning the sex offender:

(A)The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction may determine the appropriate times and days for in-person reporting by the sexually dangerous person, and the determination shall be consistent with the reporting requirements of subdivision (h)(1) of this section.

Registration verification shall include reporting in person any change to the following information concerning the sexually dangerous person:

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 5; 1999, No. 1353, § 4; 2001, No. 202, §§ 1-3; 2001, No. 1089, § 1; 2001, No. 1743, § 5; 2003, No. 1185, § 18; 2003, No. 1265, § 4[3]; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 4; 2005, No. 1962, § 34; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 3; 2007, No. 394, § 5; 2011, No. 143, §§ 1, 2; 2011, No. 1009, § 1; 2013, No. 172, § 3; 2013, No. 505, §§ 3-7; 2013, No. 508, §§ 2-8; 2013, No. 1129, §§ 2, 3; 2015, No. 358, §§ 2-7; 2017, No. 916, § 3; 2019, No. 262, §§ 1-3; 2019, No. 587, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 703-711.

12-12-907. Report to Arkansas Crime Information Center — Report to law enforcement agency.

The center shall immediately enter the information into its record system for maintenance in a central registry and notify the local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction.

The center will share information with the National Sex Offender Public Website.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 6; 1999, No. 1353, § 5; 2001, No. 1743, § 6; 2013, No. 505, § 8; 2013, No. 508, § 9; 2015, No. 358, § 8; 2017, No. 916, § 4; 2019, No. 262, §§ 4-6; 2019, No. 910, §§ 712, 713.

12-12-908. Registration format — Requirements.

The sex offender's full name and all aliases that the sex offender has used or under which the sex offender has been known;

Date of birth;

Sex;

Race;

Height;

Weight;

Hair and eye color;

Certain information such as Social Security number, driver's license number, employer, email addresses, user names, screen names, or instant message names, information that may lead to identification of the victim, and other similar information may be excluded from the information that is released during the course of notification.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 7; 1999, No. 1353, § 6; 2001, No. 1743, § 7; 2011, No. 143, § 1[3]; 2013, No. 505, § 9; 2017, No. 916, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 714.

12-12-909. Verification form — Change of address.

(1)A sex offender required to register under this subchapter shall verify registration in person every six (6) months after the sex offender's initial registration date during the period of time in which the sex offender is required to register.

(A)(i)The verification shall be done in person at a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction at which time the sex offender shall sign and date a Sex Offender Acknowledgment Form and a law enforcement officer shall also witness and sign the Sex Offender Acknowledgment Form.

The Sex Offender Acknowledgment Form shall state the date of verification as well as a date that the sex offender is required to return in person to a specific local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction to verify his or her address.

When a change of address to another state is reported to the center, the center shall immediately notify the law enforcement agency with which the sex offender must register in the new state if the new state has a registration requirement.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 8; 2001, No. 1743, § 8; 2007, No. 394, § 6; 2011, No. 64, § 1; 2013, No. 505, § 10; 2015, No. 358, § 9; 2017, No. 916, § 6; 2019, No. 262, §§ 7-10.

12-12-910. Fine.

(A)A person who fails to pay the fee required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section upon conviction is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

The fee provided in subsection (b) of this section shall be collected by the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the person's sex offender verification and shall be remitted by the tenth day of each month to the Administration of Justice Funds Section of the Office of Administrative Services of the Department of Finance and Administration on a form provided by that office for deposit into the Sex and Child Offenders Registration Fund as established by §12-12-911.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 9; 2003, No. 1765, § 4; 2011, No. 812, § 1; 2013, No. 42, § 1.

12-12-911. Sex and Child Offenders Registration Fund.

Any unexpended balance of this fund shall be carried forward and made available for the same purpose.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 10; 1999, No. 1353, § 7; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 5;
2019, No. 910, § 715.

12-12-912. Arrests for violations.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 12; 2001, No. 1743, § 9; 2015, No. 358, § 10; 2017, No. 916, § 7.

12-12-913. Disclosure.

Registration records may also be open to government agencies authorized by law to conduct confidential background checks.

Registration records shall be open to the Division of Medical Services of the Department of Human Services for Medicaid provider applicants under §12-12-927.

The Sex Offender Assessment Committee shall submit the proposed guidelines and procedures to the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor for their review and shall report to the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor every six (6) months on the implementation of this section.

If a change occurs in a sex offender's release plan, this notification provision shall not require an extension of the release date.

In conjunction with the notice provided under §12-12-914, the Division of Correction and the Department of Human Services shall make available to a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction all information that the Division of Correction and the Department of Human Services have concerning the sex offender, including information on risk factors in the sex offender's history.

Except as provided in subsection (j) of this section, information under this section is not subject to disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

The Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board shall promulgate guidelines for the disclosure to students of information regarding a sex offender when information regarding a sex offender is released to an institution of higher education by a local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction.

In accordance with guidelines promulgated by the State Board of Education, the board of directors of a local school district or institution of vocational training shall adopt a written policy regarding the distribution to students and parents of information regarding a sex offender.

In accordance with guidelines promulgated by the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, the board of directors of an institution of higher education shall adopt a written policy regarding the distribution to students of information regarding a sex offender.

High-risk or sexually dangerous persons, risk Level 3 and Level 4; or

In noncompliance with the requirements of registration under rules promulgated by the Sex Offender Assessment Committee.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 13; 1999, No. 1353, § 8; 2001, No. 1743, § 10; 2003, No. 330, §§ 1, 2; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 6; 2005, No. 1962, § 35; 2007, No. 147, § 1; 2007, No. 394, § 7; 2009, No. 165, § 7; 2013, No. 505, §§ 11–14; 2013, No. 508, §§ 10, 11; 2013, No. 1504, § 1; 2017, No. 916, §§ 8, 9; 2019, No. 315, § 864; 2019, No. 910, §
716.

12-12-914. Notice of release.

The Department of Human Services shall provide notice by written or electronic means to the center of the anticipated release from incarceration of a person committed following an acquittal on the grounds of mental disease or defect for a sex offense.

The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction; and

Other state and local law enforcement agencies as appropriate for public safety.

If notification cannot be made throughout the system established under §12-12-1201 et seq., the Division of Correction shall provide the notification to the victim.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 14; 1999, No. 1353, § 9; 2001, No. 1743, § 11; 2019, No. 910, §§ 717, 718.

12-12-915. Authority — Rules.

Notifying the sex offender of the obligation to register pursuant to this subchapter; and

Registering the sex offender.

The Department of Human Services shall monitor an adult or juvenile sex offender under its supervisory authority who is subject to electronic monitoring under §12-12-923.

The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules to establish procedures for monitoring an adult or juvenile sex offender under its supervisory authority who is subject to electronic monitoring under §12-12-923.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 15; 2003 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 21, § 7; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 4; 2007, No. 394, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 719.

12-12-916. Publication and notice of obligation to register.

The Office of Driver Services of the Department of Finance and Administration shall provide notice of the obligation to register pursuant to this subchapter in connection with each driver's license issued pursuant to §27-16-801 and each identification card issued pursuant to §27-16-805.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 989, § 16.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1997, No. 989, § 16, this section contained a subsection (a) that read:

“The Arkansas Crime Information Center shall cause notice of the obligation to register to be published in a manner reasonably calculated to reach the general public within thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act [August 1, 1997].”